Ohio, session 136, SB319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5101.72 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5101.72. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Long-term care facility" has the same meaning as in section 3721.21 of the Revised Code; (2) "Residential care facility" has the same meaning as in section 3721.01 of the Revised Code. (B) In addition to the duties described in sections 5101.61 to 5101.71 of the Revised Code, a county department of job and family services or its designee has the authority to receive and investigate reports alleging that an individual who is an adult as defined in section 5101.60 of the Revised Code, except that the individual does not reside in an independent living arrangement, is being exploited by an individual who is not used by the long-term care facility or residential care facility in which the adult resides to provide services to residents. (C) If an investigation undertaken under this section results in a determination that the adult who is the subject of the investigation is in need of protective services, the department or its designee shall provide protective services to the adult in accordance with sections 5101.61 to 5101.71 of the Revised Code. (D) The authority of the department described in this section is in addition to the authority and duties of the long-term care ombudsman program described in sections 173.15 to 173.28 of the Revised Code.